src/verb-nob-morph.txt
LEXICON GYVE 
gyve+V+Inf:gyve  # ;
gyve+V+Imp:gyv  # ;
gyve+V+Ind+Prs:gyver  # ;
gyve+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gyves  # ;
gyve+V+Ind+Prt:gjøv  # ;
gyve+V+Ind+Prt:gøyv  # ;
gyve+V+PrfPtc:gyvd  # ;
gyve+V+PrfPtc:gjøvet  # ;
gyve+V+PrsPtc:gyvende  # ;

LEXICON GÅ
gå+V+Inf:gå  # ;
gå+V+Imp:gå  # ;
gå+V+Ind+Prs:går  # ;
gå+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gås  # ;
gå+V+Ind+Prt:gikk  # ;
gå+V+PrfPtc:gått  # ;
gå+V+PrsPtc:gående  # ;

LEXICON HA
ha+V+Inf:ha  # ;
ha+V+Imp:ha  # ;
ha+V+Ind+Prs:har  # ;
ha+V+Ind+Prt:hadde  # ;
ha+V+PrfPtc:hatt  # ;
ha+V+PrsPtc:haende  # ;

LEXICON HENGE
henge+V+Inf:henge  # ;
henge+V+Imp:heng  # ;
henge+V+Ind+Prs:henger  # ;
henge+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:henges  # ;
henge+V+Ind+Prt:hang  # ;
henge+V+PrfPtc:hunget  # ;
henge+V+PrfPtc:hengt  # ;
henge+V+PrsPtc:hengende  # ;

LEXICON HETE
hete+V+Inf:hete  # ;
hete+V+Imp:het  # ;
hete+V+Ind+Prs:heter  # ;
hete+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:hetes  # ;
hete+V+Ind+Prt:het  # ;
hete+V+Ind+Prt:hette  # ;
hete+V+PrfPtc:hett  # ;
hete+V+PrfPtc:hetet  # ;
hete+V+PrsPtc:hetende  # ;

LEXICON HIVE 
hive+V+Inf:hive  # ;
hive+V+Imp:hiv  # ;
hive+V+Ind+Prs:hiver  # ;
hive+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:hives  # ;
hive+V+Ind+Prt:hev  # ;
hive+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:heiv  # ;
hive+V+PrfPtc:hivd  # ;
hive+V+PrfPtc:hevet  # ;
hive+V+PrsPtc:hivende  # ;

LEXICON HJELPE
hjelpe+V+Inf:hjelpe  # ;
hjelpe+V+Imp:hjelp  # ;
hjelpe+V+Ind+Prs:hjelper  # ;
hjelpe+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:hjelpes  # ;
hjelpe+V+Ind+Prt:hjalp  # ;
hjelpe+V+PrfPtc:hjulpet  # ;
hjelpe+V+PrsPtc:hjelpende  # ;

LEXICON HOGGE 
hogge+V+Inf:hogge  # ;
hogge+V+Imp:hogg  # ;
hogge+V+Ind+Prs:hogger  # ;
hogge+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:hogges  # ;
hogge+V+Ind+Prt:hogd  # ;
hogge+V+Ind+Prt:hugget  # ;
hogge+V+PrfPtc:hogget  # ;
hogge+V+PrfPtc:hugd  # ;
hogge+V+PrsPtc:hoggende  # ;

LEXICON HOLDE 
holde+V+Inf:holde  # ;
holde+V+Imp:hold  # ;
holde+V+Ind+Prs:holder  # ;
holde+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:holdes  # ;
holde+V+Ind+Prt:holdt  # ;
holde+V+PrfPtc:holdt  # ;
holde+V+PrsPtc:holdende  # ;

LEXICON HUGGE 
hugge+V+Inf:hugge  # ;
hugge+V+Imp:hugg  # ;
hugge+V+Ind+Prs:hugger  # ;
hugge+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:hugges  # ;
hugge+V+Ind+Prt:hugd  # ;
hugge+V+Ind+Prt:hogget  # ;
hugge+V+PrfPtc:hugd  # ;
hugge+V+PrfPtc:hugget  # ;
hugge+V+PrsPtc:huggende  # ;

LEXICON KLINGE 
klinge+V+Inf:klinge  # ;
klinge+V+Imp:kling  # ;
klinge+V+Ind+Prs:klinger  # ;
klinge+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:klinges  # ;
klinge+V+Ind+Prt:klang  # ;
klinge+V+PrfPtc:klinget  # ;
klinge+V+PrsPtc:klingende  # ;

LEXICON KLIPE 
klipe+V+Inf:klipe  # ;
klipe+V+Imp:klip  # ;
klipe+V+Ind+Prs:kliper  # ;
klipe+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:klipes  # ;
klipe+V+Ind+Prt:klep  # ;
klipe+V+Ind+Prt:kleip  # ;
klipe+V+PrfPtc:klipt  # ;
klipe+V+PrfPtc:klepet  # ;
klipe+V+PrsPtc:klipende  # ;

LEXICON KLIVE 
klive+V+Inf:klyve  # ;
klive+V+Imp:klyv  # ;
klive+V+Ind+Prs:klyver  # ;
klive+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:klyves  # ;
klive+V+Ind+Prt:kløv  # ;
klive+V+Ind+Prt:kløyv  # ;
klive+V+Ind+Prt:klauv  # ;
klive+V+PrfPtc:kløvet  # ;
klive+V+PrsPtc:klyvende  # ;

LEXICON KLYPE 
klype+V+Inf:klype  # ;
klype+V+Imp:klyp  # ;
klype+V+Ind+Prs:klyper  # ;
klype+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:klypes  # ;
klype+V+Ind+Prt:kløp  # ;
klype+V+Ind+Prt:kløyp  # ;
klype+V+Ind+Prt:klaup  # ;
klype+V+PrfPtc:kløpe  # ;
klype+V+PrsPtc:klypende  # ;

LEXICON KLYVE 
klyve+V+Inf:klyve  # ;
klyve+V+Imp:klyv  # ;
klyve+V+Ind+Prs:klyver  # ;
klyve+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:klyves  # ;
klyve+V+Ind+Prt:klyv  # ;
klyve+V+PrfPtc:klyv  # ;
klyve+V+PrsPtc:klyvende  # ;

LEXICON KNEKKE 
knekke+V+Inf:knekke  # ;
knekke+V+Imp:knekk  # ;
knekke+V+Ind+Prs:knekker  # ;
knekke+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:knekkes  # ;
knekke+V+Ind+Prt:knakk  # ;
knekke+V+PrfPtc:knekket  # ;
knekke+V+PrfPtc:knekt  # ;
knekke+V+PrsPtc:knekkende  # ;

LEXICON KNESTE 
kneste+V+Inf:kneste  # ;
kneste+V+Imp:knest  # ;
kneste+V+Ind+Prs:knester  # ;
kneste+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:knestes  # ;
kneste+V+Ind+Prt:knast  # ;
kneste+V+PrfPtc:knestet  # ;
kneste+V+PrsPtc:knestende  # ;

LEXICON KNETTE 
knette+V+Inf:knette  # ;
knette+V+Imp:knett  # ;
knette+V+Ind+Prs:knetter  # ;
knette+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:knettes  # ;
knette+V+Ind+Prt:knatt  # ;
knette+V+PrfPtc:knettet  # ;
knette+V+PrsPtc:knettende  # ;

LEXICON KNIPE 
knipe+V+Inf:knipe  # ;
knipe+V+Imp:knip  # ;
knipe+V+Ind+Prs:kniper  # ;
knipe+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:knipes  # ;
knipe+V+Ind+Prt:knip  # ;
knipe+V+Ind+Prt:kneip  # ;
knipe+V+PrfPtc:knepet  # ;
knipe+V+PrsPtc:knipende  # ;

LEXICON KOMME
komme+V+Inf:komme  # ;
komme+V+Ind+Prs:kommer  # ;
komme+V+Ind+Prt:kom  # ;
komme+V+PrfPtc:kommet  # ;
komme+V+PrsPtc:kommende  # ;
komme+V+Imp:kom  # ;

LEXICON KUNNE 
kunne+V+Inf:kunne  # ;
kunne+V+Ind+Prs:kan  # ;
kunne+V+Ind+Prt:kunne  # ;
kunne+V+PrfPtc:kunnet  # ;

LEXICON LA 
la+V+Inf:la  # ;
la+V+Imp:la  # ;
la+V+Ind+Prs:lar  # ;
la+V+Ind+Prt:lot  # ;
la+V+PrfPtc:latt  # ;

LEXICON LEGGE
legge+V+Inf:legge  # ;
legge+V+Imp:legg  # ;
legge+V+Ind+Prs:legger  # ;
legge+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:legges  # ;
legge+V+Ind+Prt:la  # ;
legge+V+PrfPtc:lagt  # ;
legge+V+PrsPtc:leggende  # ;

LEXICON LIGGE
ligge+V+Inf:ligge  # ;
ligge+V+Imp:ligg  # ;
ligge+V+Ind+Prs:ligger  # ;
ligge+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ligges  # ;
ligge+V+Ind+Prt:lå  # ;
ligge+V+PrfPtc:ligget  # ;
ligge+V+PrsPtc:liggende  # ;

LEXICON MÅTTE 
måtte+V+Inf:måtte  # ;
måtte+V+Ind+Prs:må  # ;
måtte+V+Ind+Prt:måtte  # ;
måtte+V+PrfPtc:mått  # ;

LEXICON MØTE
måtte+V+Inf:øte  # ;
måtte+V+Ind+Prsøter  # ;
måtte+V+Ind+Prt:øtte  # ;
måtte+V+PrfPtc:øtt  # ;


LEXICON RIVE
rive+V+Inf:rive  # ;
rive+V+Imp:riv  # ;
rive+V+Ind+Prs:river  # ;
rive+V+Ind+Prt:rev  # ;
rive+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:reiv  # ;
rive+V+PrfPtc:revet  # ;
rive+V+PrsPtc:rivende  # ;

LEXICON SETTE
sette+V+Inf:sette  # ;
sette+V+Imp:sett  # ;
sette+V+Ind+Prs:setter  # ;
sette+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:settes  # ;
sette+V+Ind+Prt:satte  # ;
sette+V+PrfPtc:satt  # ;
sette+V+PrsPtc:settende  # ;

LEXICON SELGE
selge+V+Inf:selge  # ;
selge+V+Imp:selg  # ;
selge+V+Ind+Prs:selger  # ;
selge+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:selges  # ;
selge+V+Ind+Prt:solgte  # ;
selge+V+PrfPtc:solgt  # ;
selge+V+PrsPtc:selgende  # ;

LEXICON SE
se+V+Inf:se  # ;
se+V+Imp:se  # ;
se+V+Ind+Prs:ser  # ;
se+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ses  # ;
se+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sees  # ;
se+V+Ind+Prt:så  # ;
se+V+PrfPtc:sett  # ;
se+V+PrsPtc:seende  # ;

LEXICON SIGE 
sige+V+Inf:sige  # ;
sige+V+Imp:sig  # ;
sige+V+Ind+Prs:siger  # ;
sige+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:siges  # ;
sige+V+Ind+Prt:seg  # ;
sige+V+Ind+Prt:seig  # ;
sige+V+PrfPtc:siget  # ;
sige+V+PrfPtc:sigd  # ;
sige+V+PrsPtc:sigende  # ;

LEXICON SITTE
sitte+V+Inf:sitte  # ;
sitte+V+Imp:sitt  # ;
sitte+V+Ind+Prs:sitter  # ;
sitte+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sittes  # ;
sitte+V+Ind+Prt:satt  # ;
sitte+V+PrfPtc:sittet  # ;
sitte+V+PrsPtc:sittende  # ;

LEXICON SI
si+V+Inf:si  # ;
si+V+Imp:si  # ;
si+V+Ind+Prs:sier  # ;
si+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sies  # ;
si+V+Ind+Prt:sa  # ;
si+V+PrfPtc:sagt  # ;
si+V+PrsPtc:siende  # ;

LEXICON SKJELVE 
skjelve+V+Inf:skjelve  # ;
skjelve+V+Imp:skjelv  # ;
skjelve+V+Ind+Prs:skjelver  # ;
skjelve+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skjelves  # ;
skjelve+V+Ind+Prt:skalv  # ;
skjelve+V+PrfPtc:skjelvet  # ;
skjelve+V+PrsPtc:skjelvende  # ;

LEXICON SKJÆRE 
skjære+V+Inf:skjære  # ;
skjære+V+Imp:skjær  # ;
skjære+V+Ind+Prs:skjærer  # ;
skjære+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skjæres  # ;
skjære+V+Ind+Prt:skar  # ;
skjære+V+PrfPtc:skåret  # ;
skjære+V+PrsPtc:skjærende  # ;

LEXICON SKLI 
skli+V+Inf:skli  # ;
skli+V+Imp:skli  # ;
skli+V+Ind+Prs:sklir  # ;
skli+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sklis  # ;
skli+V+Ind+Prt:sklidde  # ;
skli+V+Ind+Prt:skled  # ;
skli+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:sklei  # ;
skli+V+PrfPtc:sklidd  # ;
skli+V+PrsPtc:skliende  # ;

LEXICON SKRIDE 
skride+V+Inf:skride  # ;
skride+V+Imp:skrid  # ;
skride+V+Ind+Prs:skrider  # ;
skride+V+Ind+Prs:skrir  # ;
skride+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skrides  # ;
skride+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skris  # ;
skride+V+Ind+Prt:skred  # ;
skride+V+PrfPtc:skredet  # ;
skride+V+PrsPtc:skridende  # ;

LEXICON SKRIKE 
skrike+V+Inf:skrike  # ;
skrike+V+Imp:skrik  # ;
skrike+V+Ind+Prs:skriker  # ;
skrike+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skrikes  # ;
skrike+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:skreik  # ;
skrike+V+Ind+Prt:skrek  # ;
skrike+V+PrfPtc:skreket  # ;
skrike+V+PrsPtc:skrikende  # ;

LEXICON SKRIVE
skrive+V+Inf:skrive  # ;
skrive+V+Imp:skriv  # ;
skrive+V+Ind+Prs:skriver  # ;
skrive+V+Ind+Prt:skrev  # ;
skrive+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:skreiv  # ;
skrive+V+PrfPtc:skrevet  # ;
skrive+V+PrsPtc:skrivende  # ;

LEXICON SKRYTE 
skryte+V+Inf:skryte  # ;
skryte+V+Imp:skryt  # ;
skryte+V+Ind+Prs:skryter  # ;
skryte+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skrytes  # ;
skryte+V+Ind+Prt:skrøt  # ;
skryte+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:skraut  # ;
skryte+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:skrøyt  # ;
skryte+V+PrfPtc:skrytt  # ;
skryte+V+PrsPtc:skrytende  # ;

LEXICON SKULLE 
skulle+V+Inf:skulle  # ;
skulle+V+Ind+Prs:skal  # ;
skulle+V+Ind+Prt:skulle  # ;
skulle+V+PrfPtc:skullet  # ;

LEXICON SKVETTE 
skvette+V+Inf:skvette  # ;
skvette+V+Imp:skvett  # ;
skvette+V+Ind+Prs:skvetter  # ;
skvette+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skvettes  # ;
skvette+V+Ind+Prt:skvatt  # ;
skvette+V+PrfPtc:skvettet  # ;
skvette+V+PrsPtc:skvettende  # ;

LEXICON SKYTE 
skyte+V+Inf:skyte  # ;
skyte+V+Imp:skyt  # ;
skyte+V+Ind+Prs:skyter  # ;
skyte+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skytes  # ;
skyte+V+Ind+Prt:skjøt  # ;
skyte+V+Ind+Prt:skøyt  # ;
skyte+V+Ind+Prt:skaut  # ;
skyte+V+PrfPtc:skutt  # ;
skyte+V+PrsPtc:skytende  # ;

LEXICON SKYVE 
skyve+V+Inf:skyve  # ;
skyve+V+Imp:skyv  # ;
skyve+V+Ind+Prs:skyver  # ;
skyve+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:skyves  # ;
skyve+V+Ind+Prt:skjøv  # ;
skyve+V+Ind+Prt:skauv  # ;
skyve+V+PrfPtc:skjøvet  # ;
skyve+V+PrsPtc:skyvende  # ;

LEXICON SLEPPE 
sleppe+V+Inf:sleppe  # ;
sleppe+V+Imp:slepp  # ;
sleppe+V+Ind+Prs:slepper  # ;
sleppe+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:sleppes  # ;
sleppe+V+Ind+Prt:slapp  # ;
sleppe+V+PrfPtc:sluppet  # ;
sleppe+V+PrsPtc:sleppende  # ;

LEXICON SLIPPE 
slippe+V+Inf:slippe  # ;
slippe+V+Imp:slipp  # ;
slippe+V+Ind+Prs:slipper  # ;
slippe+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:slippes  # ;
slippe+V+Ind+Prt:slapp  # ;
slippe+V+PrfPtc:sluppet  # ;
slippe+V+PrsPtc:slippende  # ;

LEXICON SLITE 
slite+V+Inf:slite  # ;
slite+V+Imp:slit  # ;
slite+V+Ind+Prs:sliter  # ;
slite+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:slites  # ;
slite+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:sleit  # ;
slite+V+Ind+Prt:slet  # ;
slite+V+PrfPtc:slitt  # ;
slite+V+PrsPtc:slitende  # ;

LEXICON SLÅSS
slåss+V+Inf:slåss  # ;
slåss+V+Imp:slåss  # ;
slåss+V+Ind+Prs:slåss  # ;
slåss+V+Ind+Prt:sloss  # ;
slåss+V+PrsPtc:slåssende  # ;

LEXICON SLÅ
slå+V+Inf:slå  # ;
slå+V+Imp:slå  # ;
slå+V+Ind+Prs:slår  # ;
slå+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:slås  # ;
slå+V+Ind+Prt:slo  # ;
slå+V+PrfPtc:slått  # ;
slå+V+PrsPtc:slående  # ;

LEXICON SMELLE 
smelle+V+Inf:smelle  # ;
smelle+V+Imp:smell  # ;
smelle+V+Ind+Prs:smeller  # ;
smelle+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:smelles  # ;
smelle+V+Ind+Prt:smalt  # ;
smelle+V+PrfPtc:smelt  # ;
smelle+V+PrsPtc:smellende  # ;

LEXICON SMETTE 
smette+V+Inf:smette  # ;
smette+V+Imp:smett  # ;
smette+V+Ind+Prs:smetter  # ;
smette+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:smettes  # ;
smette+V+Ind+Prt:smatt  # ;
smette+V+PrfPtc:smettet  # ;
smette+V+PrsPtc:smettende  # ;

LEXICON SMYGE 
smyge+V+Inf:smyge  # ;
smyge+V+Imp:smyg  # ;
smyge+V+Ind+Prs:smyger  # ;
smyge+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:smyges  # ;
smyge+V+Ind+Prt:smøg  # ;
smyge+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:smøyg  # ;
smyge+V+Ind+Prt+Radical:smaug  # ;
smyge+V+PrfPtc:smøget  # ;
smyge+V+PrsPtc:smygende  # ;

LEXICON SMØRE 
smøre+V+Inf:smøre  # ;
smøre+V+Imp:smør  # ;
smøre+V+Ind+Prs:smører  # ;
smøre+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:smøres  # ;
smøre+V+Ind+Prt:smurte  # ;
smøre+V+PrfPtc:smurt  # ;
smøre+V+PrsPtc:smørende  # ;

LEXICON SNIKE 
snike+V+Inf:snike  # ;
snike+V+Imp:snik  # ;
snike+V+Ind+Prs:sniker  # ;
snike+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:snikes  # ;
snike+V+Ind+Prt:sneik  # ;
snike+V+Ind+Prt:snek  # ;
snike+V+PrfPtc:sneket  # ;
snike+V+PrsPtc:snikende  # ;

LEXICON SNYTE 
snyte+V+Inf:snyte  # ;
snyte+V+Imp:snyt  # ;
snyte+V+Ind+Prs:snyter  # ;
snyte+V+Ind+Prs+Pass:snytes  # ;
snyte+V+Ind+Prt:snøt  # ;
snyte+V+Ind+Prt:snøyt  # ;
snyte+V+PrfPtc:snytt  # ;
snyte+V+PrsPtc:snytende  # ;

LEXICON SOVE
sove+V+Inf:sove  # ;
sove+V+Imp:sov  # ;
sove+V+Ind+Prs:sover  # ;
sove+V+Ind+Prt:sov  # ;
sove+V+Ind+PrfPtc:sovet  # ;
sove+V+PrsPtc:sovende  # ;
